Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 3 Promulgation of Rules and Regulations

Cross references.

Administration and enforcement of health laws generally, T. 31, C. 5.

37-1-40.
Power of board to provide and promote standards, rules, and regulations.

The board shall adopt and promulgate written rules, regulations, and standards as may be deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this title and which shall be the basis of state financial participation in mental health, developmental disabilities,
and addictive diseases programs.

History. Code 1933, § 88-601, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Code 1981, §

37-1-41

; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 8; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

37-1-40

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 37/HB 142.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 37/HB 142, effective May 13, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 37-1-40 as Code Section 37-1-41.

37-1-41.
Rules and regulations of Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

All rules and regulations of the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History. Code 1933, § 88-307, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, §

37-1-40

; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 11; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

37-1-41

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 37/HB 142.

Cross references.

County boards of health generally, T. 31, C. 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 12, effective July 1, 1994, not codified by the General Assembly, amends Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19.1 to exempt the 1993 amendment of this Code section from repeal on June 30, 1999.